en: Camping Cookware & Dinnerware
xx: Camping Cookware & Dinnerware
cs: Kempinkové nádobí a jídelní sady
da: Campingkogegrej og -spisestel
de: Camping-Töpfe & -Geschirr
es: Vajillas y utensilios de cocina para camping
fr: Ustensiles et vaisselle de cuisine pour le camping
it: Pentole e stoviglie da campeggio
ja: キャンプ用調理器具・食器類
nl: Kookgereedschap en borden en bestek voor kamperen
no: Kokeutstyr og servise til campingbruk
pl: Turystyczne akcesoria kuchenne
pt: Panelas e louça para camping
ru: Туристическая кухонная и столовая посуда
sv: Kokkärl och bestick för camping
tr: Kamp Pişirme Gereçleri ve Yemek Takımları

en: Camping Lights & Lanterns
xx: Camping Lights & Lanterns
cs: Kempinková světla a lucerny
da: Campingbelysning og lanterner
de: Campingleuchten & -laternen
es: Faroles y lámparas de camping
fr: Lampes et lanternes de camping
it: Luci e lampade da campeggio
ja: キャンプ用ライト・ランタン
nl: Kamperverlichting en -lantaarns
no: Campinglys og -lykter
pl: Oświetlenie kempingowe
pt: Luzes e lanternas para camping
ru: Туристические лампы и фонари
sv: Campinglampor och lyktor
tr: Kamp Işık ve Fenerleri

en: Camping Tools
xx: Camping Tools
cs: Kempinkové vybavení
da: Campingredskaber
de: Campinghilfsmittel
es: Herramientas de camping
fr: Outils de camping
it: Strumenti da campeggio
ja: キャンプ用品
nl: Kampeerartikelen
no: Campingverktøy
pl: Narzędzia kempingowe
pt: Ferramentas para camping
ru: Туристические инструменты
sv: Campingutrustning
tr: Kampçılık Aletleri

en: Hunting & Survival Knives
xx: Hunting & Survival Knives
cs: Lovecké nože
da: Jagtknive og overlevelsesknive
de: Jagdmesser
es: Cuchillos de caza
fr: Couteaux de chasse, Couteau (chasse)
it: Coltelli da caccia
ja: サバイバルナイフ
nl: Jachtmessen
no: Jakt- og overlevelseskniver
pl: Noże myśliwskie i survivalowe
pt: Facas de caça e sobrevivência
ru: Охотничьи ножи
sv: Jakt- och överlevnadsknivar
tr: Av ve Hayat İdame Bıçakları

en: Multifunction Tools & Knives
xx: Multifunction Tools & Knives
cs: Multifunkční nástroje a nože
da: Multifunktionelle redskaber og knive
de: Multifunktionswerkzeuge & -messer
es: Navajas y herramientas multifunción
fr: Outils et couteaux multi-usages
it: Strumenti e coltelli multifunzione
ja: マルチツール・多機能ナイフ
nl: Multifunctionele gereedschappen en messen
no: Flerfunksjonsverktøy og -kniver
pl: Noże i narzędzia wielofunkcyjne
pt: Ferramentas e facas multifuncionais
ru: Многофункциональные приборы и ножи
sv: Multifunktionsverktyg och -knivar
tr: Çok İşlevli Alet ve Bıçaklar

en: Chemical Hand Warmers
xx: Chemical Hand Warmers
cs: Chemické ohřívače rukou
da: Kemiske håndvarmere
de: Taschenwärmer
es: Calientamanos químicos
fr: Chauffe-mains chimiques
it: Scaldamani chimici
ja: カイロ
nl: Chemische handverwarmers
no: Kjemiske håndvarmere
pl: Chemiczne ogrzewacze dłoni
pt: Aquecedores químicos de mão
ru: Химические грелки для рук
sv: Kemiska handvärmare
tr: Kimyasal El Isıtıcılar

en: Compression Sacks
xx: Compression Sacks
cs: Kompresní vaky
da: Kompressionssoveposer
de: Kompressionssäcke
es: Sacos de compresión
fr: Sacs de compression
it: Sacche a compressione
ja: コンプレッションサック
nl: Compressiezakken
no: Utstyrssekker
pl: Worki kompresyjne
pt: Sacos de compressão
ru: Компрессионные мешки
sv: Kompressionspåsar
tr: Sıkıştırma Perlonları

en: Hiking Pole Accessories
xx: Hiking Pole Accessories
cs: Turistické hole – příslušenství
da: Vandrestav – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Trekkingstöcke
es: Accesorios de bastones de senderismo
fr: Accessoires pour bâtons de marche
it: Accessori per bastoncini trekking
ja: トレッキングポール関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor wandelstokken
no: Tilbehør til gåstaver
pl: Akcesoria kijków trekkingowych
pt: Acessórios para bastões de caminhada
ru: Принадлежности для трекинговых палок
sv: Tillbehör till vandringsstavar
tr: Yürüyüş Batonu Aksesuarları

en: Hiking Poles
xx: Hiking Poles
cs: Turistické hole
da: Vandrestave
de: Trekkingstöcke
es: Bastones de senderismo
fr: Bâtons de marche
it: Bastoni da trekking
ja: トレッキングポール
nl: Wandelstokken
no: Gåstaver
pl: Kijki trekkingowe
pt: Bastões para caminhada
ru: Трекинговые палки
sv: Vandringsstavar
tr: Yürüyüş Batonları

en: Mosquito Nets & Insect Screens
xx: Mosquito Nets & Insect Screens
cs: Moskytiéry a sítě proti hmyzu
da: Myggenet
de: Moskitonetze & Fliegengitter
es: Mosquiteras
fr: Moustiquaires, Moustiquaire
it: Zanzariere
ja: 蚊帳
nl: Muskietennetten en insectengaas
no: Myggnetting og insektsskjermer
pl: Moskitiery
pt: Mosquiteiros e telas
ru: Москитные сетки
sv: Myggnät
tr: Sivrisinek Ağları ve Sineklikler

en: Navigational Compasses
xx: Navigational Compasses
cs: Kompasy
da: Kompasser
de: Navigationskompasse
es: Brújulas
fr: Boussoles de navigation
it: Bussole da navigazione
ja: 方位磁石
nl: Navigatiekompassen
no: Kompasser
pl: Kompasy
pt: Bússolas de navegação
ru: Навигационные компасы
sv: Kompasser
tr: Pusulalar

en: Portable Toilets & Showers
xx: Portable Toilets & Showers
cs: Přenosné toalety a sprchy
da: Flytbare toiletter og brusere
de: Mobile Toiletten & Duschen
es: Duchas y retretes portátiles
fr: Toilettes et douches mobiles
it: Docce e toilette portatili
ja: 携帯トイレ・シャワー
nl: Mobiele wc's en douches
no: Bærbare toaletter og dusjer
pl: Przenośne toalety i prysznice
pt: Chuveiros e banheiros portáteis
ru: Переносные туалеты и души
sv: Portabla toaletter och duschar
tr: Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve Duşlar

en: Portable Showers & Privacy Enclosures
xx: Portable Showers & Privacy Enclosures
cs: Přenosné sprchy a sprchové kouty
da: Flytbare brusere og afskærminger
de: Mobile Duschen & Sichtschutz
es: Recintos privados y duchas portátiles
fr: Douches et cabines temporaires mobiles
it: Docce portatili e tende spogliatoio
ja: シャワー用簡易テント
nl: Mobiele douches en privacyschermen
no: Bærbare dusjer og dusjtelt
pl: Przenośne prysznice i parawany
pt: Recintos privativos e chuveiros portáteis
ru: Переносные души со шторами
sv: Portabla duschar och omklädningsutrymmen
tr: Taşınabilir Duşlar ve Paravanlar

en: Portable Toilets & Urination Devices
xx: Portable Toilets & Urination Devices
cs: Přenosné toalety a pisoáry
da: Flytbare toiletter og enheder til vandladning
de: Mobile Toiletten & Urinale
es: Urinarios y retretes portátiles
fr: Toilettes et dispositifs urinaires mobiles
it: Bagni da campeggio e orinatoi portatili
ja: 携帯トイレ
nl: Mobiele wc's en urinoirs
no: Bærbare toaletter og tissetrakter
pl: Przenośne toalety i pisuary
pt: Banheiros portáteis
ru: Переносные туалеты и устройства для мочеиспускания
sv: Portabla toaletter och urinbehållare
tr: Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve İdrar Çıkarma Cihazları

en: Portable Water Filters & Purifiers
xx: Portable Water Filters & Purifiers
cs: Přenosné vodní filtry a čističky
da: Transportable vandfiltre og vandrensere
de: Tragbare Wasserfilter & Wasserreiniger
es: Purificadores y filtros de agua portátiles
fr: Filtres portables et épurateurs d'eau
it: Filtri e purificatori portatili acqua
ja: 携帯用浄水器
nl: Draadbare waterfilters en zuiveringstoestellen
no: Bærbare vannfiltre og -rensere
pl: Przenośne filtry i oczyszczacze do wody
pt: Filtros e purificadores de água portáteis
ru: Переносные водоочистители
sv: Portabla vattenfilter och vattenrenare
tr: Portatif Su Filtreleri ve Arıtıcılar

en: Sleeping Bag Liners
xx: Sleeping Bag Liners
cs: Vložky do spacích pytlů
da: Snore til soveposer
de: Innenschlafsack
es: Fundas para saco de dormir
fr: Doublures pour sacs de couchage
it: Fodere per sacchi a pelo
ja: 寝袋ライナー
nl: Slaapzakbinnenhoezen
no: Innersoverposer
pl: Wkładki do śpiworów
pt: Forros para saco de dormir
ru: Вкладыши для спальных мешков
sv: Lakanpåsar till sovsäckar
tr: Uyku Tulumu Astarları

en: Sleeping Bags
xx: Sleeping Bags
cs: Spací pytle
da: Soveposer
de: Schlafsäcke
es: Sacos de dormir
fr: Sacs de couchage, Sac de couchage
it: Sacchi a pelo
ja: 寝袋
nl: Slaapzakken
no: Soveposer
pl: Śpiwory
pt: Sacos de dormir
ru: Спальные мешки
sv: Sovsäckar
tr: Uyku Tulumları

en: Sleeping Pads
xx: Sleeping Pads
cs: Spací podložky
da: Liggeunderlag
de: Isomatten
es: Colchonetas para dormir
fr: Matelas de sol
it: Materassini per dormire
ja: スリーピングマット
nl: Kampeermatten
no: Soveunderlag
pl: Maty kempingowe
pt: Colchonetes para saco de dormir
ru: Туристические спальные коврики
sv: Liggunderlag
tr: Uyku Matları

en: Tent Accessories
xx: Tent Accessories
cs: Stany – příslušenství
da: Telttilbehør
de: Zeltzubehör
es: Accesorios para tiendas de campaña
fr: Accessoires de tente
it: Accessori per tende
ja: テント関連用品
nl: Tentaccessoires
no: Telttilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do namiotów
pt: Acessórios para barracas
ru: Принадлежности для палаток
sv: Tälttillbehör
tr: Çadır Aksesuarları

en: Inner Tents
xx: Inner Tents
cs: Vnitřní části stanů
da: Indertelte
de: Innenzelte
es: Tiendas interiores
fr: Toiles intérieures
it: Tende interne
ja: インナーテント
nl: Binnententen
no: Innertelt
pl: Sypialnie do namiotów
pt: Parte interna da barraca
ru: Внутренние палатки
sv: Innertält
tr: İç Çadırlar